Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-720
Agreement; landowner's rights.

A voluntary agreement between a landowner and the commission or the participating cooperators to register a natural area shall not affect a landowner's property rights or use of the land. The landowner may withdraw from the agreement by notifying the commission. No state or local governmental agency may require landowner consent to the agreement as a condition of any permit or penalize any landowner in any way for failure to give or for withdrawal of such consent.

Laws 1989, LB 251, § 8;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-1407;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 334.